Alabama, session 2026rs, HB298.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 37-15-5, Code of Alabama 1975, is
amended to read as follows:
"§37-15-5
Page 1

"§37-15-5
HB298 INTRODUCED
(a) Until January 1, 20272036:
(1) Operators who have underground facilities within
this state shall participate in and utilize the services of
the One-Call Notification System.
(2) Operators that are members of the One-Call
Notification System on January 1, 2020, must remain members.
(3) Operators with more than 25,000 customers or 500
miles of facilities, that are not members, must join the
One-Call Notification System by January 1, 2021.
(4) Operators that do not meet the thresholds described
in subdivision (2) or (3), must join the One-Call Notification
System by January 1, 2022.
(5)(2) Operators of electrical underground facilities
that join the One-Call Notification System under the
requirements of subdivision (3) or (4) having less than five
percent underground trench miles compared to the total miles
of line, are not subject to the membership costs until their
underground trench miles exceed the trench mile exemption.
These operators shall be required to report annually to the
One-Call Notification System their percentage of underground
trench miles by the end of each calendar year.
(6)(3) If an operator of an underground facility fails
to become a member of the One-Call Notification System, as
required by this chapter, and that failure is a cause of
damage to that underground facility caused by a person who has
complied with this chapter and has exercised reasonable care
in the performance of the excavations that has caused damage
to the underground facility, the operator has no right of
Page 2

to the underground facility, the operator has no right of
HB298 INTRODUCED
recovery against the person for the damage to that underground
facility.
(b) Between April 18, 1994, and January 1, 1995, or any
time thereafter, anyAny non-profitnonprofit corporation,
public corporation, or governmental entity desiring to become
the One-Call Notification System shall apply to the Alabama
Public Service Commission for a certificate of public
convenience and necessity, verifying under oath that the
applicant meets the requirements of this chapter. After a
public hearing on the application, if the Alabama Public
Service Commission deems that the applicant meets the
requirements of this chapter, and if it is found that the
applicant is fit, willing, and able to properly perform the
services proposed and that the proposed service is or will be
required by the present or future public convenience or
necessity, then in such event the Alabama Public Service
Commission may issue a certificate of public convenience and
necessity authorizing the applicant to commence its operation
as the One-Call Notification System. The Alabama Public
Service Commission shall revoke a certificate if the
non-profitnonprofit corporation, public corporation, or
governmental entity ceases to meet the requirements as set
forth in this chapter. The One-Call Notification System must
provide a report of operations and financial review or audit
to the Public Service Commission annually.
(c) Subject to subsections (a) and (b), there shall be
a statewide One-Call Notification System in accordance with
this chapter to provide notice of all excavation or demolition
Page 3

this chapter to provide notice of all excavation or demolition
HB298 INTRODUCED
near underground facilities.
(d) The One-Call Notification System shall be
incorporated or operated as a non-profitnonprofit corporation
and governed by a board of directors representing its
membership in accordance with the One-Call Notification System
bylaws.
(e) Operators of underground natural gas or hazardous
liquid pipeline facilities or the One-Call Notification System
acting on their behalf shall develop and implement a public
awareness and damage prevention program to educate the general
public, excavators, and operators about the availability and
use of the One-Call Notification System as required in
applicable federal regulations and the requirements of this
chapter.
(f) The person giving notice of intent to excavate or
100 demolish shall be furnished an individual reference file
101 number for each notification and upon request shall be
102 furnished the names of the operators to whom the notification
103 will be transmitted.
104 (g) An adequate record of notifications shall be
105 maintained by the underground facility operator or the
106 One-Call Notification System in order to document timely
107 compliance with this chapter. These records shall be retained
108 for a period of not less than three years and shall be made
109 available at a reasonable cost upon proper and adequate
110 advance request.
111 (h) The services of the One-Call Notification System
112 shouldshall be provided on working days in accordance with the
Page 4

shouldshall be provided on working days in accordance with the
HB298 INTRODUCED
113 established working day hours.
114 (i) The One-Call Notification System shouldshall voice
115 record the notification telephone calls and after
116 hoursafter-hours calls should at least reach a voice recording
117 which explains emergency procedures.
118 (j) All members of the One-Call Notification System
119 shall provide the One-Call Notification System with the
120 following information:
121 (1) The notification area data in a format as required
122 by the current database system utilized by the One-Call
123 Notification System for the locations in which members have
124 underground facilities or for other reasons wish to receive
125 notifications of proposed excavations, demolitions, or
126 blasting. This information shall be updated at least once a
127 year.
128 (2) The name, address, and telephone number of a person
129 to receive emergency notifications.
130 (k) The One-Call Notification System shall promptly
131 transmit the information received from the excavator, as set
132 forth in Section 37-15-4, to its appropriate member operators.
133 (l) All members of the One-Call Notification System who
134 have changes, additions, or new installations of buried
135 facilities within the boundaries of the State of Alabama shall
136 notify the One-Call Notification System of changes in the
137 information required in subdivision (1) of subsection (j)(1),
138 within 30 days of the completion of such change, addition, or
139 new installation."
140 Section 2. This act shall become effective on January
Page 5

Section 2. This act shall become effective on January
HB298 INTRODUCED
141 1, 2027.
Page 6